Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-13-43.
Warrants; assignment thereof.

Warrants shall be drawn by the clerk, under his seal of office, in favor of the claimants, on all demands, claims and accounts allowed by the board, in the order of their allowance, against the several funds in the county depository from which such allowed claims must be paid. The board of supervisors of any county may, in its discretion, adopt the use of a standard check signing machine to be used in lieu of the manual signing of warrants by the clerk, under such terms and conditions as the board shall deem meet and proper for the protection of the interest of the county. No warrant shall be signed, removed from the warrant book, nor delivered by the clerk until there is sufficient money in the fund upon which it is drawn to pay the same and all prior unpaid warrants drawn upon that fund, whether delivered or not. The owner of any claim so allowed may, either before or after allowance, transfer the same by assignment, and the holder of such assignment shall be entitled to receive the warrant therefor at the proper time by presenting such assignment to the clerk at any time before delivery of such warrant to the original claimant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2936; Laws, 1940, ch. 253; Laws, 1950, ch. 244, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 374, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).

§ 19-13-45.
Registration and payment of warrants.

All county warrants shall be registered in a book to be provided by the board for that purpose, and the fact of registration shall be noted on the back of the warrant. The county depository shall pay warrants in the order of their registration, unless there be sufficient funds in the treasury to pay all registered warrants. This order of payment shall not however apply to jury or witness certificates, nor to warrants used in payment of taxes. A warrant not presented for payment within one year after date of its registration shall lose its priority. When warrants so used in the payment of taxes are turned over to the county depository by the tax collector in settlement the said tax collector shall make a list of said warrants so paid for taxes, showing date of registration of said warrants and showing by whom and on what dates said warrants were so paid for taxes, and said list shall have attached to it the affidavit of said tax collector that said warrants were actually received by his office in payment of taxes from the parties and on the dates as set out in said list.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 318; 1906, § 339; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3712; 1930, § 262; 1942, § 2947; Laws, 1912, ch. 206.

§ 19-13-47.
Oath required.

The county depository shall not receive a jury or witness certificate nor a school warrant from any clerk, sheriff, or any county officer in settlement unless the officer make oath that he received the same in payment of taxes due the county, or that he paid the holder the full sum of its face value, without discount or abatement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1702; 1892, § 324; 1906, § 345; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3718; 1930, § 263; 1942, § 2948.

§ 19-13-49.
Claims for livestock killed or injured in dipping process.

Any owner of livestock making claim under §19-5-13 for damages for the death or injury of such livestock occasioned through the process of dipping or as a result of such dipping for the eradication of cattle tick, shall first make proof of the amount of his loss or damage to the board of supervisors. When conclusive proof has been made or submitted to the board and there is no evidence of contributory negligence on the part of the owner and the board is satisfied that the said owner has suffered such loss, then the board of supervisors shall pay to such owner out of the general county funds, such amount as will compensate him for his loss or damage. If the board of supervisors shall refuse to pay such claims, or any part of them, the owner shall have the right of action against the county where such damage occurred.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3807b; 1930, § 266; 1942, § 2951; Laws, 1917, ch. 38.

§ 19-13-51.
Defective bridges, causeways, and culverts; damages allowable for injury suffered therefrom.

The board of supervisors of any county shall have the power, in its discretion, to allow damages sustained to stock and other property injured or destroyed while traveling along the public highways maintained by the county where such loss is caused by defects in a bridge, causeway or culvert in such highway. No such payment shall be allowed unless such defect in such bridge, causeway or culvert was the proximate cause of the injury and was not apparent or discoverable by the exercise of reasonable diligence, and no such payment shall be made unless such defect had existed for such a time that the failure to remedy or repair the same amounts to gross carelessness on the part of the county. Such payments shall be made from the county road and bridge funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3802; 1930, § 267; 1942, § 2952; Laws, 1914, ch. 203; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 14, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-13-53.
Defective bridges, causeways, and culverts-presentation of claims.

A claim under Section 19-13-51 for accidents occurring shall be made in writing, itemized and sworn to, and shall be filed within three months after such accident occurs, and shall remain on file with the clerk of the board of supervisors for sixty days before the first day of the term at which it comes up for hearing. Notice of its pendency shall be published in a newspaper published in the county at least one time before such claim comes up for hearing, and if there be no paper in such county, by posting notices at the courthouse and other public places.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3803; 1930, § 268; 1942, § 2953; Laws, 1914, ch. 203.

§ 19-13-55.
Defective bridges, causeways, and culverts; payment of claims.

No payment shall be made hereunder except by a four-fifths recorded vote of all the members of the board of supervisors. Where the property injured or destroyed is properly assessable, no evidence of the actual value of the property injured or destroyed shall be received or considered, but the assessed value thereof as shown by the assessment rolls of the county shall be the only evidence of value, and the damages allowed shall be fixed in proportion. Where the property injured or destroyed is not properly assessable and was not assessed, then the board of supervisors shall receive evidence of the actual value of the same, and shall allow damages in proportion. Sections 19-13-51 through 19-13-55 shall not be construed as creating any enforceable liability against any county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3804, 3805; 1930, § 269; 1942, § 2954; Laws, 1914, ch. 203.